src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON CNJ_TENSE   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for tense in conjunct
! Skipping tense preverbs with various conditions
@R.joiner.hyphen@                                                  VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.joiner.NULL@                                                    VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.cnj.CC@                                                         VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.frag.FRAG@                                                      VERBPREFIXES ;
! Regular occurrence of tense preverbs
! kî(h)-
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@kî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@kî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
! wî(h)-
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/wi+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/wi+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@wî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
! kî(-)wî(h)-
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@kî-wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@kîwî%^EGLOT%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
! Prefix fragments ending with these tense preverbs
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kî             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ka             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@wî             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kî-wî    VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kîwî     VERB_FRAG ;

! LEXICON CNJ_TENSE   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for tense in conjunct
! @U.tense.Prs@                                                                           VERBPREFIXES ;
! @U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@kî-%<        VERBPREFIXES ;
! @U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@kî^EGLOT%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
! @U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
! @U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@wî^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;


LEXICON IMPERATIVE   !!= @CODE@ gives flag for imperative (no prefixes)
@U.order.imp@  VERBPREFIXES ;


!! Preverbs
!     ==========

LEXICON VERBPREFIXES  !!= @CODE@ just adds the prefix boundary
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
REDUPLICATION ;
PREVERBS ;

LEXICON REDUPLICATION
RdplW+:d1ay2 REDUPL_BOUND ;
RdplS+:d1âh  REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@d2ay3d1âh      REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@d2ay3-d1âh REDUPL_BOUND ;

@P.frag.FRAG@ REDUPL_FRAG;

LEXICON REDUPL_FRAG
RdplW+:ca VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ka VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ma VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:na VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:pa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:sa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ta VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:wa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ya VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:câh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:kâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:mâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:nâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:pâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:sâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:tâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:wâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:yâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@cacâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ca-câh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@kakâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ka-kâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@mamâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ma-mâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@nanâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@na-nâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@nanâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@na-nâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@papâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@pa-pâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@sasâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@sa-sâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@tatâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ta-tâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@wawâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@wa-wâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@yayâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ya-yâh VERB_FRAG ;

LEXICON REDUPL_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%< REDUPL_CONT ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@            VERB_FRAG ;

@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%< REDUPL_CONT ;
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC            VERB_FRAG ;

! @U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
! @U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@-%< REDUPL_CONT ;

LEXICON REDUPL_CONT
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
PREVERBS ;

LEXICON PREVERBS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ VERB_FRAG ;

@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC VERB_FRAG ;

! @U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
! @U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;


LEXICON WICI
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@wîci%^EGLOT%<      VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@wîci-%<        VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wici+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@wîci            VERB_FRAG ;

@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@wîci%^IC%^EGLOT%<      VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@wîci%^IC-%<        VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wici+:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@wîci%^IC            VERB_FRAG ;

!! Now, LEXC directs us to the ../stems/verbs_stems.lexc file,
!! where we find all the verbal stems. The suffixes are then
!! found in the section "Suffixes" right underneath.

! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================

!! # Suffixes

!! Intransitive inanimate (II)
!      ===========================
!      ===========================

!!! AEW == Ours: VIIv == VIIw, VIIn == VIIn

!!! STEM CLASS

LEXICON VIIn !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VIIn_SGPL_WICI ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VIIn_SG_WICI ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VIIw_PL_WICI ;

!! LEXICON VIIw_PL !!= @CODE@  NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
!! +V+II: VIIw_PL_WICI ;	   NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

LEXICON VIIw !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VIIw_SGPL_WICI ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VIIw_SG_WICI ;

LEXICON PREVERBS
PV/apisisi+:apisîsi PREVERBS_BOUND "small" ; ! Size
PV/ayi+:ayi PREVERBS_BOUND "ah, hm" ; 
PV/apihtawi+:âpihtawi PREVERBS_BOUND "half" ; 
PV/cipehtako+:cîpêhtako PREVERBS_BOUND "blue, greyish blue, grey" ; 
PV/kakwahyaki+:kakwâhýaki PREVERBS_BOUND "greatly, extremely, overwhelmingly; with startled surprise" ;
PV/kayasi+:kayâsi PREVERBS_BOUND "old" ; 
PV/kipi+:kipi PREVERBS_BOUND "blocking" ; 
PV/kimoci+:kîmôci PREVERBS_BOUND "secretly, by stealth" ; 
PV/kota+:kôta PREVERBS_BOUND "long for, be deprived of" ; 
PV/kwaskwe+:kwâskwê PREVERBS_BOUND "upwards" ; 
PV/mani+:mani PREVERBS_BOUND "with the intent of, with the purpose of" ; 
PV/mayaci+:mâýâci PREVERBS_BOUND "bad" ; 
PV/misakame+:misakâmê PREVERBS_BOUND "all the way" ; 
PV/nahta+:nahtâ PREVERBS_BOUND "able; good at, competent, practised, experienced, skillful at, expert at, known as one who does s.t. habitually; well" ; 
PV/natakasi+:nâtakâsi PREVERBS_BOUND "into the bush country" ; 
PV/nihtaciwe+:nîhtaciwê PREVERBS_BOUND "downhill, down" ; 
PV/paci+:paci PREVERBS_BOUND "wrongly, in error" ; 
PV/pimipahci+:pimipahci PREVERBS_BOUND "running, on the run" ; 
PV/saposci+:sâposci PREVERBS_BOUND "through" ; 
PV/tahto+:tahto PREVERBS_BOUND "as many as" ; 
PV/wayawi+:waýawî PREVERBS_BOUND "outside; out from inside, out from the tipi" ; 
PV/wisaki+:wîsaki PREVERBS_BOUND "painfully" ; 
LEXICON VERBSTEMS
asaskitêwa:asaskitê VIIw_PL ;
asastêwa:asastê VIIw_PL ;
atihkamêkoskâw:atihkamêkoskâ VIIw_SG ;
awasêwêmakan:awasêwêmakan3 VIIn ;
awasitêw:awasitê VIIw ;
ayamihêwi-kîsikâw:ayamihêwi-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
ayiwâkipêw:aýiwâkipê VIIw_SG ;
âhkwêhtawastêwa:âhkwêhtawastê VIIw_PL ;
âkawâstêw:âkawâstê VIIw_SG ;
âkô-wiyipâw:âkô-wiýipâ VIIw ;
âpihtâ-kîsikâw:âpihtâ-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
âpihtâ-nîpin:âpihtâ-nîpin3 VIIn_SG ;
âsokâmatin:âsokâmatin VIIn_SG ;
âstêyâkamin:âstêyâkamin VIIn ;
cahcakwahcâsin:cahcakwahcâsin VIIw ;
cipiskâsin:cipiskâsin VIIn_SG ;
cîpayi-kîsikâw:cîpayi-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
isikamâw:isikamâ VIIw ;
ispakocin:ispakocin VIIn ;
itamow:itamo VIIw ;
kakwêspanêyihtâkwan:kakwêspanêýihtâkwan3 VIIn ;
kaskamotâpahtêw:kaskamotâpahtê VIIw_SG ;
kaskitêwâpahtêw:kaskitêwâpahtê VIIw ;
kêhtênâkwan:kêhtênâkwan3 VIIn ;
kimiwan:kimiwan3 VIIn_SG ;
kimiwaskin:kimiwaskin VIIn_SG ;
kinwaskitêw:kinwaskitê VIIw ;
kisinâsin:kisinâsin VIIn_SG ;
kisinâw:kisinâ VIIw_SG ;
kispakaskitêw:kispakaskitê VIIw ;
kispakêkihtin:kispakêkihtin VIIn ;
kîsapwêw:kîsapwê VIIw_SG ;
kîskisikâtêw:kîskisikâtê VIIw ;
kîsopwê-yôtin:kîsopwê-ýôtin VIIn_SG ;
kîsopwêw:kîsopwê VIIw_SG ;
kîspinacikêmakan:kîspinacikêmakan3 VIIn ;
koskwâwâtan:koskwâwâtan3 VIIn_SG ;
kwêskihtinipayiw:kwêskihtinipaýi VIIw ;
maci-manitowan:maci-manitowan3 VIIn ;
mahkastêwa:mahkastê VIIw_PL ;
mahkêsîskâw:mahkêsîskâ VIIw_SG ;
maskawêkinowiw:maskawêkinowi VIIw ;
matakwan:matakwan3 VIIn ;
mâci-sîkwan:mâci-sîkwan3 VIIn_SG ;
mâmawaskitêwa:mâmawaskitê VIIw_PL ;
mâmawipayiwa:mâmawipaýi VIIw_PL ;
mâtinawê-kîsikâw:mâtinawê-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
mêstâskitêw:mêstâskitê VIIw ;
mêyiwan:mêyiwan3 VIIn ;
mihcêtoskanawa:mihcêtoskana VIIw_PL ;
mihkwaskwan:mihkwaskwan3 VIIn_SG ;
misâw:misâ VIIw ;
misisâhkoskâw:misisâhkoskâ VIIw_SG ;
misposin:misposin VIIn_SG ;
miyonâkwan:miýonâkwan3 VIIn ;
mîkisihkahtêw:mîkisihkahtê VIIw ;
môsoskâw:môsoskâ VIIw_SG ;
nakâhtin:nakâhtin VIIn_SG ;
naspitâtômakan:naspitâtômakan3 VIIn ;
nêyâskwêyâw:nêyâskwêyâ VIIw ;
nikotwâso-kîsikâw:nikotwâso-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
niyânaniwa:niyânani VIIw_PL ;
nîpâmâyâtan:nîpâmâýâtan3 VIIn ;
nîpitêstêwa:nîpitêstê VIIw_PL ;
nîso-kîsikâw:nîso-kîsikâ VIIw_SG ;
nîswaskitêwa:nîswaskitê VIIw_PL ;
ohtin:ohtin VIIn_SG ;
oskâhtikosiskâw:oskâhtikosiskâ VIIw_SG ;
pakastawêpayin:pakastawêpaýin VIIn ;
pasakocêskiwakâw:pasakocêskiwakâ VIIw ;
pêsowan:pêsowan3 VIIn ;
pêtâpan:pêtâpan3 VIIn_SG ;
piskwatinâw:piskwatinâ VIIw ;
pîhcihtin:pîhcihtin VIIn ;
pîhciyowêw:pîhciýowê VIIw_SG ;
pîsimowan:pîsimowan3 VIIn_SG ;
pôni-kimiwan:pôni-kimiwan3 VIIn_SG ;
saskaniyowêw:saskaniýowê VIIw_SG ;
sâkamon:sâkamon VIIn ;
sâpopêw:sâpopê VIIw ;
sâwan:sâwan3 VIIn_SG ;
sîwispakwan:sîwispakwan3 VIIn ;
sôniyâskâw:sôniyâskâ VIIw_SG ;
tahkâyâsin:tahkâyâsin VIIn_SG ;
takahkispakwan:takahkispakwan3 VIIn ;
takopitêw:takopitê VIIw ;
tipiskâw:tipiskâ VIIw_SG ;
waskowan:waskowan3 VIIn_SG ;
wayawîyâstan:waýawîyâstan3 VIIn ;
wâpihtakâw:wâpihtakâ VIIw ;
wâsakâmêskitêwa:wâsakâmêskitê VIIw_PL ;
wiyinowan:wiýinowan3 VIIn ;
wîhkwêstêwa:wîhkwêstê VIIw_PL ;
yîkowan:ýîkowan3 VIIn_SG ;
yîwêkotêw:ýîwêkotê VIIw ;
yôtin:ýôtin VIIn_SG ;
